Utah statutes.
61-2f-511.   Authority to take disciplinary action.

(1)  This part does not limit the authority of the director of the division to take disciplinary action against a real estate licensee for a violation of this chapter or of the rules of the commission and division.

(2)  A real estate licensee's payment of all the obligations of the real estate licensee to the fund does not nullify or modify the effect of any other disciplinary proceeding brought pursuant to this chapter or the rules of the commission.

